Utah statutes.
73-18-13.6.   Grounds for confiscation of registration materials by state -- Registration renewal.

(1) (a)  The division, any peace officer acting in an official capacity, or a person authorized under Subsection (2) may take possession of any registration card or decal issued by the state:

(i)  upon revocation of it;

(ii)  that is fictitious;

(iii)  that has been unlawfully or erroneously issued; or

(iv)  that is unlawfully or erroneously displayed.

(b)  A receipt shall be issued that describes each confiscated item.

(2)  The division may enter into contractual agreements with constables or other law enforcement agencies to facilitate confiscation of items listed in Subsection (1) if a person fails or refuses to surrender any of those documents to the division upon demand.

(3)  The division shall renew a registration that has been revoked under this section in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-18-7.



Amended by Chapter 386, 2011 General Session

